ext-firefox-thunderbird-seamonkey/british-english-dictionary-darmeth/dictionaries/en-GB.aff
SFX O Y 22
SFX O 0 al ch[ei]
SFX O 0 al te
SFX O 0 al [eimru][bfn]
SFX O 0 al ss
SFX O 0 al it
SFX O 0 al [nt]ant
SFX O 0 al [ghiorstx][ao]n
SFX O 0 al [eo]nt
SFX O 0 al as
SFX O 0 l a
SFX O 0 al [cos]t
SFX O 0 ial eon
SFX O 0 al [cdghmpwx]
SFX O 0 ial r
SFX O e ial [ai]ge
SFX O e ial ice
SFX O 0 tal ut
SFX O e inal ude
SFX O e al [mnrsv]e
SFX O e al [aioy][dp]e
SFX O e al uge
SFX O y ial y
SFX o Y 12
SFX o 0 lly a
SFX o e ally [^bcgv]e
SFX o e ially [bcgv]e
SFX o 0 ially [bcrx]
SFX o um ally um
SFX o 0 ally [^u]m
SFX o y ally ty
SFX o y ially [^t]y
SFX o 0 ually [px]t
SFX o 0 tally [iu]t
SFX o 0 ally [^ipux]t
SFX o 0 ally [^aebcrtxmy]
SFX W Y 25
SFX W ce tific ce
SFX W e atic me
SFX W se tic se
SFX W le ic ble
SFX W e ic [^b]le
SFX W e ic [^clms]e
SFX W 0 lic [^x][ay]l
SFX W 0 ic [x][ay]l
SFX W 0 ic [^ay]l
SFX W us ic us
SFX W 0 tic [^u]s
SFX W er ric [^hm]er
SFX W 0 ic [^e]r
SFX W 0 atic [aeiou]m
SFX W 0 ic [^aeiou]m
SFX W 0 tic ma
SFX W a ic [^im]a
SFX W a c [i]a
SFX W y etic thy
SFX W y ic [^t]hy
SFX W y tic sy
SFX W y ic [^hs]y
SFX W 0 ic [^aeilmrsy]
SFX W 0 ic [hm]er
SFX W 0 c [dghlmsz]i
SFX w Y 9
SFX w e ical e
SFX w er rical er
SFX w 0 ical [^e]r
SFX w 0 atical [aeiou]m
SFX w 0 ical [^aeiou]m
SFX w 0 tical ma
SFX w a ical [^m]a
SFX w y ical y
SFX w 0 ical [^aemry]
SFX 1 Y 9
SFX 1 e ically e
SFX 1 er rically er
SFX 1 0 ically [^e]r
SFX 1 0 atically [aeiou]m
SFX 1 0 ically [^aeiou]m
SFX 1 0 tically ma
SFX 1 a ically [^m]a
SFX 1 y ically y
SFX 1 0 ically [^aemry]
SFX 3 Y 27
SFX 3 e ist [^aceiou]e
SFX 3 ce tist ce
SFX 3 0 ist [aeiou]e
SFX 3 y ist apy
SFX 3 y ist ropy
SFX 3 y ist [^aeioubp]y
SFX 3 0 ist [^r][^a][aeioubp]y
SFX 3 o ist o
SFX 3 0 ist [^eoy]
SFX 3 e ists [^aceiou]e
SFX 3 ce tists ce
SFX 3 0 ists [aeiou]e
SFX 3 y ists apy
SFX 3 y ists ropy
SFX 3 y ists [^aeioubp]y
SFX 3 0 ists [^r][^a][aeioubp]y
SFX 3 o ists o
SFX 3 0 ists [^eoy]
SFX 3 e ist's [^aceiou]e
SFX 3 ce tist's ce
SFX 3 0 ist's [aeiou]e
SFX 3 y ist's apy
SFX 3 y ist's ropy
SFX 3 y ist's [^aeioubp]y
SFX 3 0 ist's [^r][^a][aeioubp]y
SFX 3 o ist's o
SFX 3 0 ist's [^eoy]
