ext-firefox-thunderbird-seamonkey/british-english-dictionary-darmeth/dictionaries/en-GB.dic
abortion/S3M
absolute/S3Y
absurd/Y3
accession/ODG
accident/oOMS
accordion/M3S
acrobat/S1MW
actuary/SOo
acupuncture/M3
addition/SMOo
advent/3MS
adverb/MSo
adversary/OSM
aerial/MYS3
aerobiology/w
aeronaut/wW1
aesthete/wSW1M
agonist/1SW
agriculture/OoM
agrology/wW
agronomy/Ww
alarm/3kMDSG
alchemist/wW
alchemy/13wMW
alcohol/S1WM
alderman/MW
aliment/ONS
allegory/QSM1Ww
allele/SW
allopath/W1
allotrope/1WZ
alphabet/QqwWMS1
alpine/3MS
altruist/1SW
Ama/MO
ambrosia/Oo
amnesia/W
amore/3oO
anaemia/WM
anaerobe/1SW
anaesthesiology/3
analogy/1wMS
analyse/RGWDS
analytic/OSY
anarchy/3Ww
anatomy/Q3WSw1
anecdote/SWoM
angel/MWw1S
Anglophobia/WM
anima/nOo
anisotropy/WMS
annalist/S1W
anorexia/MW
antenna/OSM
anthropology/31w
anthropometry/w1W
antimony/WO
antiphon/oOS
ant/MDWS
a/o
apathy/W
ape/mDSwMyG
aphorist/W1
aphrodisiac/OMS
apocrypha/oO
apothegmatic/O
arbitration/O
arboriculture/3O
archaeology/31Mw
archetype/1wSO
architecture/SOMo
archive/M3ODSG
aristocrat/1SMW
aromatherapy/3
aroma/WQS1M
arouse/SDOG
arson/3
artery/OSMo
artifice/oSO
association/O
asthma/W1M
astrology/w13M
astronomy/Ww1M
asymptote/1SWMw
atheist/1SWM
atmosphere/WSM1
atone/GoWDSO
Atta/MO
audiology/13w
aura/OSo
autarchy/WMS
author/dMqQOS
autobiography/Sw1WM
autocrat/1WMS
automat/dW1
autotroph/ZSMW
autumn/SoOM
Awa/MO
azimuth/oSM
bacteria/MoO
bactericide/oOS
bacteriology/31w
baptism/SoMO
bare/YTGDSW
bas/o1dOSZ
bass/3SM
Bela/OM
Belga/WM
benefice/OoS
betroth/SDOG
bible/Mw1S
bicycle/3MGSD
biogeography/W
biography/MSw1W
biometry/Ww1
bionomic/OYS
bioscience/3S
blackly/3
bore/GkDSW
botany/3QwW1
bronchi/O
brutal/Q3
brute/MSo
Bude/MW
Cabra/MO
calligraphy/1W
camber/dSW
cane/OSM
canoe/3DSGM
canon/QqS1wWyM
capita/oO
cardiology/3
carne/ONoXM
carouse/OSDG
catalyse/GDSW
catarrh/Oo
catastrophe/SW1M
cathedra/O
cell/3MDS
cerebra/Oo
ceremony/oMSO
chalcedony/W
charisma/W1M
chemic/YO
chemurgy/Ww
cherub/WM1S
chimera/SWw1
chiropody/3
chord/MDOGS
choreograph/SZDRW1G
chore/WSOo
chromatograph/1ZW
chronograph/SW
chronology/1WwMS
chronometer/MWS1
cinematograph/RWZS1
circuit/SMdO
claustrophobia/W
client/SMO
climatology/1w
clone/RGMoDS
coax/koG
coenobite/wWS
college/SMo
colloid/SO
colloquy/Oo
colony/oSOM
column/DM3S
combinatory/O
commerce/o
commercialist/W
compensation/OMS
computation/oO
concept/SoVM
condensation/O
configuration/o
confrontation/O
con/GdDVNnSw1W
consistory/OS
conspiracy/3MS
conspirator/SMoO
continent/oSMYO
controversy/oMOS
convention/SoOM
conversational/3
conversation/Oo
core/OSM
correction/OMS
cosmography/wW
cosmology/13wWSM
crania/Oo
creature/YMSO
criminology/M3w
crit/w1W
crypt/1SMW
cryptograph/Z1RWw
culture/MOSDoG
cybernetic/3S
cycle/G3MwWDS1
cylinder/1wSMd
Dada/3M
Danya/OM
da/zMVo
decagon/OS
decasyllable/W
decry/OG
deist/wWS1
demagogy/1wW
demography/W1w
demonstration/O
demote/GDW
dendrochronology/3
dent/3SMDOoG
department/Oo
dermatology/3wW
despot/1W
detector/3SM
detriment/OSo
development/oO
diagrammatic/OY
dialect/MOW1owS
dialectology/w
diarrhoea/SOWM
didactic/OYS
differentia/Oo
dilatation/O
diploma/1WMS
diplomat/3MS
diplopia/W
director/MSZO
distortion/SOM
doctrine/oSOM
dodecahedra/O
dome/wDSMG
dramaturg/ZS1MWw
druid/WSw
dualist/W1
duodena/Oy
dynamometry/W
dysfunction/SDOG
dystrophy/W
ecclesiology/w
ecology/1wW
economy/wM3QSW1q
editor/SOMo
egoist/Ww1S
egotist/wS1W
electromagnet/1WS
element/OMSo
emblem/1wMSW
embryology/wW
empire/SWwM1
empiric/3
endosperm/W
enigma/1WSMw
entomology/3wQ
entropy/1WS
environmental/3
ephemera/oSO
epidemiology/31Ww
epiphenomena/Oo
episode/1MWS
epitaph/MWS
epithet/MWwS
eterne/QoO
eth/1RMWw
ethnic/SYO
ethnography/1wW
ethnology/1Ww
etymology/QS1w
euhemerist/W1
eulogist/1W
European/Q3SM
evangelist/WS1
exegete/Ww1
expansionist/SW
experimental/3
expressionist/SW1
expression/pOM
extern/oO
extreme/S3Y
f/37
falsetto/S3
fanatic/SQOMY
fantast/1w
fatalist/1WS
fat/S2MdYZoGTD
fatty/3S
feudalist/W
feud/DOGSoM
fin/1So7wdDMOZ
fission/BOS
folklore/3W
folklorist/W
formulae/1W
foundation/Oo
friction/poMOS
front/MODpGoS
fundament/oO
gastroenterology/3
gastronomy/W
genera/nvV1WOo
genetic/3S
genet/S1W
genocide/MSO
geography/1MWSw
geometry/1QWMSw
glace/o
glaciology/w
glycol/WS
gora/OSM
graph/S1GMWDw
gynaecology/3MWw
habitue/SoN
hairstyle/M3GS
Hasid/MWS
heliotrope/M1S
hemisphere/WSwM
henotheist/W
hepatology/3
heptagon/MOS
herpetology/w1
hexagon/oMOS
hierarch/1WOwZ
Hila/MyO
Hispano/3
historiography/w
history/w1KW
homoeopath/WMSZ1
homology/Q1w
hoo/3
hormone/MSOo
horologe/ZwW
hygiene/3MW1
hyperbole/MQSW1w
hypochondriac/OMS
hypoderm/W1
iconography/wW
icon/WMS
idealist/1W
ident/wMS1
ideology/S3wM1
idiom/1SWM
imbecile/1YMSW
immunology/w
imperialist/1W
improvisation/O
Ina/Mo
increment/DOGoS
infinitive/MOS
inquisitor/SoO
instrumental/MS3
insurrection/y3OMS
intention/oSODM
intervention/3SM
intestine/MOSo
iron/Sd1wWM
Islamophobia/WM
Jain/3SM
Jama/OM
jihad/3SM
journalist/1W
judice/7Oo
juridic/YO
Kat/MWZ
Kida/OM
Kuse/MO
left/3MZS
lethargy/1SW
lingua/Oo
lithograph/WZS1
liturgy/w1MS
lo/3
loc/7RDOVNGn
lyre/M1SWw
lyric/S3M
macrocosm/1SW
mag/S1Ww
malaria/MO
margin/OdMoS
Markova/WM
materialist/SW1
matrimony/Oo
maturation/O
med/1SMOWw
mediaeval/3
media/noSOM
melodrama/1MSW
melody/3MSW1
Meng/OM
mercury/oMOW
mesentery/W
metallurgy/Ww
meteorology/w3
method/1SMQw
methodology/wM1S
metre/M1WSw
microbiology/w1W
micrometeorology/w
Mika/OM
Mila/WM
minimal/3
misanthrope/1ZSW
mitochondria/O
mod/RSMGOoD
monad/WS
monarch/owOWMZ1
monograph/MWS
monophony/W1
Mont/ZMO
monument/SOMo
moralist/1WS
moron/WMS1
morphology/1wW
mort/Qo
motor/3dMS
musicology/w
myth/wSMW1
Naha/MO
nanometre/WSM
nanotechnology/3SMw
nationalist/1W
nature/oMOSDh
neoclassic/O
neocolonial/3
neolith/W
neurology/13w
neuroscience/S3M
nomad/SMW
nonsense/1wM
norm/vMOSoV
numerology/w
nutrition/3OMo
occasion/MDOGoS
ocean/WMS
odontology/3
office/SROMo
oligarch/OWMwZ1
op/O
opportunist/WS1
optimist/WSM1
opt/xDWwS1G
oral/3S
ore/OSoMy
organism/WOMSo
origin/oOMSNX
ornament/SXNGDOMo
ornithology/wM
orthorexia/W
pacifist/1W
pacify/1RXN3SDWG
palm/3GMDZS
pan/MWDGS
paradise/SOMw
parameter/wWSM
parasite/1wSWM
parent/SoMODG
parody/WGSDMw
pastoral/3S
pedagogy/wW1M
pedant/MWS1
penology/3M
pen/SGDMO
perfection/3MS
petrology/1wW
phalli/W
phantasm/SO
pharmacy/3SM
phenomena/Oo
phenomenology/w
philately/3WM
philosophy/QwWMS1
phonograph/SWM1
phonology/3w1WM
physiology/3MWw1
piano/3SM
pictograph/MWZS
pluralist/SW1
pneuma/W1
poet/MWyQ1Sw
polyhedra/OM
polyphone/WZ1
polysyllable/SW
postposition/OoS
problem/MSWw1
procedure/oSOM
professor/SoOM
programme/WMS
prophet/wMW1S
prototype/GMWSDOw1
proverb/MoS
pseudoscience/3WM
psych/1wSDWG
psychobiology/wW
psychology/w13S
psychopathology/wW
psychopharmacology/wW
purist/SWw1
quantification/O
Quran/MWS
race/RDSoMGZ
racy/3TYO
rad/1w
radiology/3Mw
radiotherapy/3M
rationale/3QSMq
rationalist/1W
Rayna/OM
reception/M3S
reduction/3
regiment/NDOMoS
reg/o
relation/Oo
reverse/O
rhapsody/W1QSM
rhythm/MW1Sw
royal/MS3Y
rust/2MWDZSG1
Ryde/MGO
s/7ko
sadist/1W
satire/3QwWSM1
saxophone/M3S
schema/1QqMS
schizophrenia/WM
scrota/O
sculpture/oGMOSD
season/dl7oOMS
seismology/Ww1
semantic/3YS
Sena/OWM
sensationalist/SW
seraph/W1S
serology/1wW
severe/TOYo
sexy/YT3M
shaman/SWM
Sieg/OM
som/1WM
somnambulist/SW
species/3
spec/oGDZMS
sphere/wS1M
spin/SRGoOM
Stalin/M3
statist/wW1
stereophony/1W
stereotype/1WDSwZG
steroid/SOM
strategy/M3QWw1S
stroboscope/w1SW
style/3pGMDS
suicide/OSoM
survival/3S
sycophant/1WS
symbol/SqQwMW1
symmetric/YO
synergist/W1
system/Sq1WM
tartar/WM
tautology/w1SM
taxonomy/13SW
technology/1WM3Sw
teleology/w
telephone/1WSDGMZ
telescope/GM1WSD
temperament/SoO
testimony/SOM
text/MRDGoS
theatre/S1wM
theory/SqQ3M
theosophy/Sw
thermometer/MWS
thermostat/SMW1
therm/SoO
Toa/OM
topography/1WSw
tor/MWS
tot/oOdZGSD
toxicology/1w
transcendent/YOo
transverse/oOY
trivia/Oo
tr/O
trombone/M3S
trophy/MWS
trop/Ww1
turntable/3SM
typo/3MS
typography/1Ww
typology/S1w
unilateral/3Y
urology/3w
Vaa/MO
vagina/SOoM
venereology/3w
Veneta/MW
veni/o
vestige/oSMO
Vida/MO
violin/3SM
virtue/SMo
viscometry/wW
vita/Oo
viticulture/3M
vocal/q3YMQS1
withdraw/GOS
w/JoQzG
wry/3T
yoga/WM
York/3M
zodiac/SOM
zoology/13wM
